New York, session 2025-2026, A3131.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3639 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3639. Access to school bus camera footage. 1. Each board of educa- 4 tion or board of trustees shall adopt policies to allow for the viewing 5 of photo or video footage captured by a camera installed inside a school 6 bus, as such term is defined in section one hundred forty-two of the 7 vehicle and traffic law, by a parent or guardian of a pupil who is 8 transported to and from school or to and from school-sponsored activ- 9 ities by such school bus, when such parent, guardian or pupil reports 10 any incident of physical harm, harassment, intimidation or bullying 11 occurring against the pupil while such pupil travelled on such school 12 bus. 13 2. The policies adopted by each board of education or board of trus- 14 tees shall require footage to be viewed under the supervision of the 15 director of schools, the school principal or a school official. Such 16 policies shall comply with applicable state regulations and federal 17 privacy laws. Such policies may establish a process or timeframe by 18 which a parent or guardian shall request access to view the photo or 19 video footage in accordance with this section. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03751-01-5